Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIX Provisional Remedies, Enforcement of Judgments, and Exemptions
Penalties

426.990.
Penalties.

Any officer who fails to advertise for sale property taken under execution as required by subsection (1) of KRS

426.340

may, on motion of either the plaintiff or the defendant in the execution, be fined by the court from which the execution issued not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than twenty dollars ($20), and costs, for the use of the party making the motion. The officer shall be given at least ten (10) days’ notice, in writing, of the motion. The officer shall, in addition to the fine provided, be liable on his bond to the party aggrieved for damages.

Any officer who fails to return a writ as required by subsection (2) of KRS

426.340

may, on motion, be fined by the court from which the writ issued not more than fifty dollars ($50), for the use of the party injured. The officer shall be given at least three (3) days’ notice, in writing, of the motion.

History.

1712, 1714.